Washington statutes.
RCW 18.130.900

Short title—Applicability.

(1) This chapter shall be known and cited as the uniform disciplinary act.

(2) This chapter applies to any conduct, acts, or conditions occurring on or after June 11, 1986.

(3) This chapter does not apply to or govern the construction of and disciplinary action for any conduct, acts, or conditions occurring prior to June 11, 1986. Such conduct, acts, or conditions must be construed and disciplinary action taken according to the provisions of law existing at the time of the occurrence in the same manner as if this chapter had not been enacted.

[ 1986 c 259 s 14; 1984 c 279 s 24.]

NOTES:

Severability—1986 c 259: See note following RCW 18.130.010.